Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-180.14
Cooperative veterinary medicine program; Board of Regents; Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary Education; powers.

The Board of Regents may construct and operate such facilities as shall be approved by the Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary Education pursuant to sections 85-1413 and 85-1414 and funded by the Legislature and may employ necessary faculty and staff to provide the clinical training of students in the cooperative veterinary medicine program pursuant to section 85-180.13. Proposed capital construction projects for veterinary medical facilities shall be reviewed, monitored, and approved or disapproved by the commission pursuant to section 85-1414 under the same standards of review applied by the commission to other capital construction projects.

Laws 1985, LB 204, § 2;

Laws 1991, LB 663, § 71;

Laws 1994, LB 683, § 1.